Utah statutes.
78A-7-211.   Compensation and expenses -- Clerical personnel.
(1)  The county, city, or town creating or maintaining a justice court shall
provide and compensate clerical personnel to conduct the business of the
court.
(2)  The selection, supervision, and discipline of court clerical personnel
shall be in accordance with local government personnel policies.
(3)  Clerical personnel are governed by Title 52, Chapter 3, regarding
employment of relatives.
(4)  The county, city, or town assumes the cost of travel and training
expenses of clerical personnel at training sessions conducted by the Judicial
Council.
